Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-674
Violations; penalty.

Any private or public entity, individual, or approved researcher who wrongfully discloses confidential data obtained from the medical record and health information registries or uses such information with the intent to deceive shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for each offense.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 12.